Utah statutes.
11-25-10.   Rules and regulations -- Acquisition and disposal of interests
in property.
All residential rehabilitation shall be constructed or completed subject to
the rules and regulations of the agency. An agency may acquire by deed,
purchase, lease, contract, gift, devise, or otherwise any real or personal
property, structures, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other
interests in lands necessary or convenient for the financing of residential
rehabilitation, upon such terms and conditions as it deems advisable, and may
lease, sell, or dispose of the same in such manner as may be necessary or
desirable to carry out the objectives and purposes of this act.
